North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-15 Tax Levies and Limitations

57-15-01.
Levy in specific amounts — Exceptions.

With the exception of special assessment taxes and such general taxes as may be definitely fixed by law, all state, county, city, township, school district, and park district taxes must be levied or voted in specific amounts of money.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, §§ 50, 51; R.C. 1899, §§ 1228, 1229; S.L. 1901, ch. 151, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 1538, 1539; C.L. 1913, §§ 2148, 2150; S.L. 1915, ch. 111, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2150; S.L. 1929, ch. 235, §§ 1, 3; R.C. 1943, § 57-1501; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 242.

Cross-References.

Levy not invalidated by malfeasance of officer, see N.D.C.C. § 57-45-05.

Relevy of invalid tax, see N.D.C.C. ch. 57-44.

57-15-01.1.
Protection of taxpayers and taxing districts.

Each taxing district may levy the lesser of the amount in dollars as certified in the budget of the governing body, or the amount in dollars as allowed in this section, subject to the following:

No taxing district may levy more taxes expressed in dollars than the amounts allowed by this section.

For purposes of this section:

“Base year” means the taxing district’s taxable year with the highest amount levied in dollars in property taxes of the three taxable years immediately preceding the budget year;

“Budget year” means the taxing district’s year for which the levy is being determined under this section;

“Calculated mill rate” means the mill rate that results from dividing the base year taxes levied by the sum of the taxable value of the taxable property in the base year plus the taxable value of the property exempt by local discretion or charitable status, calculated in the same manner as the taxable property; and

“Property exempt by local discretion or charitable status” means property exempted from taxation as new or expanding businesses under chapter 40-57.1; improvements to property under chapter 57-02.2; or buildings belonging to institutions of public charity, new single-family residential or townhouse or condominium property, property used for early childhood services, or pollution abatement improvements under section 57-02-08.

A taxing district may elect to levy the amount levied in dollars in the base year. Any levy under this section must be specifically approved by a resolution approved by the governing body of the taxing district. Before determining the levy limitation under this section, the dollar amount levied in the base year must be:

Reduced by an amount equal to the sum determined by application of the base year’s calculated mill rate for that taxing district to the final base year taxable valuation of any taxable property and property exempt by local discretion or charitable status which is not included in the taxing district for the budget year but was included in the taxing district for the base year.

Increased by an amount equal to the sum determined by the application of the base year’s calculated mill rate for that taxing district to the final budget year taxable valuation of any taxable property or property exempt by local discretion or charitable status which was not included in the taxing district for the base year but which is included in the taxing district for the budget year.

Reduced to reflect expired temporary mill levy increases authorized by the electors of the taxing district. For purposes of this subdivision, an expired temporary mill levy increase does not include a school district general fund mill rate exceeding one hundred ten mills which has expired or has not received approval of electors for an extension under subsection 2 of section 57-64-03.

Reduced by the amount of state aid under chapter 15.1-27, which is determined by multiplying the budget year taxable valuation of the school district by the lesser of the base year mill rate of the school district minus sixty mills or fifty mills, if the base year is a taxable year before 2013.

In addition to any other levy limitation factor under this section, a taxing district may increase its levy in dollars to reflect new or increased mill levies authorized by the legislative assembly or authorized by the electors of the taxing district.

Under this section a taxing district may supersede any applicable mill levy limitations otherwise provided by law, or a taxing district may levy up to the mill levy limitations otherwise provided by law without reference to this section, but the provisions of this section do not apply to the following:

Any irrepealable tax to pay bonded indebtedness levied pursuant to section 16 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota.

The one-mill levy for the state medical center authorized by section 10 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota.

A school district choosing to determine its levy authority under this section may apply subsection 3 only to the amount in dollars levied for general fund purposes under section 57-15-14 or, if the levy in the base year included separate general fund and special fund levies under sections 57-15-14 and 57-15-14.2, the school district may apply subsection 3 to the total amount levied in dollars in the base year for both the general fund and special fund accounts. School district levies under any section other than section 57-15-14 may be made within applicable limitations but those levies are not subject to subsection 3.

Optional levies under this section may be used by any city or county that has adopted a home rule charter unless the provisions of the charter supersede state laws related to property tax levy limitations.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 552, §§ 1, 2; 1997, ch. 18, § 3; 1997, ch. 486, § 1; 1999, ch. 498, § 2; 2001, ch. 510, § 5; 2007, ch. 417, § 14; 2009, ch. 535, § 1; 2011, ch. 457, § 1; 2013, ch. 13, § 47; 2015, ch. 137, § 20, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 341, § 9, eff for the first two taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016; 2017, ch. 341, § 10, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018; 2019, ch. 391, § 132, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018.

57-15-02.
Determination of rate.

The tax rate of all taxes, except taxes the rate of which is fixed by law, must be calculated and fixed by the county auditor within the limitations prescribed by statute. If any municipality levies a greater amount than the prescribed maximum legal rate of levy will produce, the county auditor shall extend only such amount of tax as the prescribed maximum legal rate of levy will produce. The rate must be based and computed on the taxable valuation of taxable property in the municipality or district levying the tax. The rate of all taxes must be calculated by the county auditor in mills, tenths, and hundredths of mills.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 2; 1943, ch. 265, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 57-1502; S.L. 1981, ch. 567, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 41.

57-15-02.1.
Property tax levy increase notice and public hearing. [Repealed effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017]

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 451, § 1; 2013, ch. 447, § 2; 2015, ch. 437, § 5, effective January 1, 2016; repealed by 2017, ch. 411, § 23, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017.

57-15-02.2.
Estimated property tax and budget hearing notice.

On or before August tenth of each year the governing body of a taxing district shall provide to the county auditor in each county in which the taxing district has taxable property a preliminary budget statement and the date, time, and location of the taxing district’s public hearing on its property tax levy, which may be no earlier than September seventh. A taxing district that fails to provide the information required under this subsection on or before August tenth may not impose a property tax levy in a greater amount of dollars than was imposed by the taxing district in the prior year.

By August thirty-first of each year the county treasurer shall provide a written notice to the owner of each parcel of taxable property with a total estimated property tax of at least one hundred dollars. The text of the notice must contain:

The date, time, and location of the public budget hearing for each of the taxing districts in which the property owner’s parcel is located, which anticipate levying in excess of one hundred thousand dollars in the current year, and the location at which the taxing district’s budget is available for review;

The true and full value of the property based on the best information available;

A column showing the actual property tax levy in dollars against the parcel by the taxing district that levied taxes against the parcel in the immediately preceding taxable year and a column showing the estimated property tax levy in dollars against the parcel by the taxing district levying tax in the taxable year for which the notice applies based on the preliminary budget statements of all taxing jurisdictions;

A column indicating the difference between the taxing district’s total levy from the previous year and the taxing district’s estimated levy with the word “INCREASE” printed in boldface type if the proposed tax levy is larger in dollars than the levy in dollars in the previous year;

Information identifying the estimated property tax savings that will be provided pursuant to section 57-20-07.1 based on the best information available; and

A statement that there will be an opportunity for citizens to present oral or written comments regarding each taxing district’s property tax levy.

Delivery of written notice under this section must be by personal delivery to the property owner, mail addressed to the property owner at the property owner’s last-known address, or electronic mail to the property owner directed with verification of receipt to an electronic mail address at which the property owner has consented to receive notice. If a parcel of taxable property is owned by more than one owner, notice must be sent to only one owner of the property. Failure of an owner to receive a notice under this section will not relieve the owner of property tax liability or modify the qualifying date under section 57-20-09 for which an owner may receive a discount for early payment of tax.

The tax commissioner shall prescribe suitable forms for written notices under this section.

The direct cost of providing taxpayer notices under this section may be allocated in a manner proportionate to the number of notices mailed on behalf of each taxing district that intends to levy in excess of one hundred thousand dollars in property taxes in the current year.

Source:

2017, ch. 411, § 21, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017.

57-15-03.
State tax levy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 567, § 2.

57-15-04.
State taxes — When levied — Certification. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 567, § 2.

57-15-05.
County tax levy.

The board of county commissioners, in levying county taxes, is limited to the amount necessary to meet the appropriations included in the county budget for the ensuing fiscal year, and to provide a reserve fund as limited in this chapter, together with a tax sufficient in amount to pay the interest on the bonded debt of the county and to provide a sinking fund to pay the principal at maturity. The county budget shall show the complete expenditure program of the county for the ensuing fiscal year and the sources of revenue from which it is to be financed.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 57-1505; S.L. 1985, ch. 613, § 1.

Cross-References.

Agricultural fairs, tax levy to aid, see N.D.C.C. §§ 4-02-26 to 4-02-30.

Airport, levy for, see N.D.C.C. § 2-06-15.

Bonds, levy to pay, see N.D.C.C. § 21-03-15.

County agent, levy for, see N.D.C.C. §§ 4-08-04, 4-08-09, 4-08-15, 4-08-15.1.

County road fund, see N.D.C.C. § 24-05-01.

Debt, levy to pay, see Const., Art. X, § 16.

Eradication of gophers, rabbits and crows, levy for, see N.D.C.C. § 4-16-02.

Extraordinary expenditures, levy for, see N.D.C.C. §§ 11-11-21 to 11-11-25.1.

Hospital associations, levy for, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-18.

Industrial planning surveys and vocational training, levy for, see N.D.C.C. § 40-57.2-04.

Insurance reserve fund, levy for, see N.D.C.C. § 32-12.1-08.

Judgment, levy to pay, see N.D.C.C. §§ 11-11-45 to 11-11-47, 32-12.1-11 to 32-12.1-14.

Library, levy for, see N.D.C.C. ch. 40-38.

Parks and recreation, levy for, see N.D.C.C. § 11-28-06.

Poor relief, levy of tax for, see N.D.C.C. § 50-03-01.

Television booster stations, levy for, see N.D.C.C. § 11-11-60.

Weather modification authority, see N.D.C.C. § 61-04.1-26.

57-15-06.
County general fund levy.

The board of county commissioners may levy property taxes for county general fund purposes at a tax rate not exceeding sixty mills per dollar of taxable valuation of property in the county.

A county that levied more than sixty mills for taxable year 2015 for the combined number of mills levied for general fund purposes plus the number of mills levied for other purposes which were combined into the general fund for taxable years after 2014 may levy for general fund purposes for taxable year 2016 the same number of mills that was levied for those purposes for taxable year 2015. A county may levy for general fund purposes for taxable year 2017 sixty mills plus seventy-five percent of the combined number of mills exceeding sixty that was levied for those purposes for taxable year 2015. A county may levy for general fund purposes for taxable year 2018 sixty mills plus fifty percent of the combined number of mills exceeding sixty that was levied for those purposes for taxable year 2015. A county may levy for general fund purposes for taxable year 2019 sixty mills plus twenty-five percent of the combined number of mills exceeding sixty that was levied for those purposes for taxable year 2015.

Unless a specific exception is provided by statute, the county general fund levy limitation under this section applies to all property taxes the board of county commissioners is authorized to levy for general county purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, §§ 4, 10; 1941, ch. 288, §§ 1, 2; 1943, ch. 268, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-1506; S.L. 1947, ch. 356, § 1; 1951, ch. 315, § 1; 1957, ch. 352, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 57-1506; S.L. 1963, ch. 88, § 6; 1969, ch. 477, § 1; 1973, ch. 211, § 2; 1973, ch. 223, § 2; 1975, ch. 516, § 1; 1981, ch. 198, § 18; 1981, ch. 571, § 2; 1983, ch. 593, § 42; 1983, ch. 606, § 68; 2015, ch. 439, § 68, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014; 2017, ch. 57, § 14, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

County deficiency levy, see N.D.C.C. ch. 57-47.

Debt void if entailing taxation beyond legal rate, see N.D.C.C. § 57-45-07.

Excess levies, see N.D.C.C. ch. 57-17.

Levy for rural township fire protection outside levy limitations, see N.D.C.C. § 18-06-11.

57-15-06.1.
County tax levy for farm-to-market road — Election. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

57-15-06.2.
Farm-to-market roads’ fund — Use. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

57-15-06.3.
County road program of farm-to-market and federal-aid roads — Tax levy — Use of excess funds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 316, § 1; 1953, ch. 177, § 25; 1957, ch. 351, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-15063; S.L. 1963, ch. 382, § 1; 1971, ch. 540, § 1; 1975, ch. 517, § 1; 1981, ch. 568, § 1; 1981, ch. 569, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 43; 1983, ch. 606, § 69; 1987, ch. 674, § 1; 1991, ch. 289, § 3; 1995, ch. 553, § 1; 2007, ch. 507, § 1; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-06.4.
Levy authorized for county veterans’ service officer’s salary, traveling, and office expenses.

The county commissioners of each county may levy annually a tax not exceeding the limitation in subsection 7 of section 57-15-06.7 to provide a fund for the payment of the salary, traveling, and office expenses of the county veterans’ service officer authorized to be appointed by section 37-14-18.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 298, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-15064; S.L. 1959, ch. 385, § 1; 1977, ch. 517, § 1; 1981, ch. 570, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 44; 1983, ch. 606, § 70; 2015, ch. 439, § 69, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-06.5.
Tax levy for planning purposes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 518, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 45; 1983, ch. 606, § 71; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-06.6.
County capital projects levy. [For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020]

The board of county commissioners of each county may levy an annual tax not exceeding ten mills plus any voter-approved additional levy as provided in subsection 8 of section 57-15-06.7 for the purpose of the following capital projects:

Constructing, equipping, and maintaining structural and mechanical components of regional or county corrections centers or for the purpose of contracting for corrections center space capacity from another public or private entity.

Acquiring real estate as a site for public parks and construction, equipping, and maintaining structural and mechanical components of recreational facilities under section 11-28-06.

Acquiring real estate as a site for county buildings and operations and constructing, equipping, and maintaining structural and mechanical components of county buildings and property.

Acquiring real estate as a site for county fair buildings and operations and constructing, equipping, and maintaining structural and mechanical components of county fair buildings and property as provided in section 4-02-26.

Acquiring and developing real estate, capital improvements, buildings, pavement, equipment, and debt service associated with financing for county supported airports or airport authorities.

Expenditures for the cost of leasing as an alternative means of financing for any of the purposes for which expenditures are authorized under subdivisions a through e.

Improvement of the county road system, including the acquisition of land; construction of new paved and unpaved roads, bridges, or public places; replacement of existing paved and unpaved roads, bridges, or public places; and maintenance and repair of existing paved and unpaved roads, bridges, or public places.

Any voter-approved levy for the purposes specified in this section approved by the electors before January 1, 2015, remains effective through 2024 or the period of time for which it was approved by the electors, whichever is less, under the provisions of law in effect at the time it was approved. After January 1, 2015, approval or reauthorization by electors of increased levy authority under this section may not be effective for more than ten taxable years.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 571, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 46; 1983, ch. 606, § 72; 1985, ch. 82, § 136; 1985, ch. 614, § 1; 2005, ch. 550, § 1; 2015, ch. 439, § 70, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014; § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016; 2021, ch. 187, 2021, ch. 187, § 2, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020, effective January 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Regional corrections centers, see N.D.C.C. ch. 12-44.1.

57-15-06.7.
Additional levies — Exceptions to tax levy limitations in counties.

The tax levy limitations specified in section 57-15-06 do not apply to the following mill levies, which are expressed in mills per dollar of taxable valuation of property in the county:

A county supporting an airport or airport authority may levy a tax not exceeding four mills in accordance with section 2-06-15.

A county levying a tax for extension work as provided in section 11-38-01 may levy a tax not exceeding two mills and if a majority of the electors of the county have approved additional levy authority under section 11-38-01, the county may levy a voter-approved tax not exceeding an additional tax of two mills.

A county levying a tax for historical works in accordance with section 11-11-53 may levy a tax not exceeding one-quarter of one mill, except that if sixty percent of the qualified electors voting on the question of a levy limit increase as provided in section 11-11-53 shall approve, the tax levy limitation may be increased to not exceeding three-quarters of one mill.

A county levying a tax for a county or community hospital association as provided in section 23-18-01 may levy a tax for not more than five years not exceeding eight mills in any one year or, in the alternative, for not more than ten years at a mill rate not exceeding five mills.

A county levying a tax for county roads and bridges as provided in section 24-05-01 may levy a tax at a tax rate not exceeding ten mills. When authorized by a majority of the qualified electors voting upon the question at a primary or general election in the county, the county commissioners may levy and collect an additional tax for road and bridge purposes as provided in section 24-05-01, not exceeding a combined additional tax rate of twenty mills.

A county levying a tax to establish and maintain a public library service as provided in section 40-38-02 may levy a tax not exceeding four mills.

A county levying a tax for a county veterans’ service officer’s salary, traveling, and office expenses in accordance with section 57-15-06.4 may levy a tax not exceeding two mills.

A county levying a tax for capital projects under section 57-15-06.6 may levy a tax not exceeding ten mills. When authorized by a majority of the qualified electors voting upon the question of a specific capital project or projects at a primary or general election in the county, the county commissioners may levy and collect an additional voter-approved tax for capital projects under section 57-15-06.6 not exceeding a tax rate of ten mills per dollar of the taxable valuation of property in the county. After January 1, 2015, approval or reauthorization by electors of increased levy authority under this subsection may not be effective for more than ten taxable years. Any voter-approved levy in excess of ten mills for the purposes specified in section 57-15-06.6 approved by the electors before January 1, 2015, remains effective through 2024 or the period of time for which it was approved by the electors, whichever is less, under the provisions of law in effect at the time it was approved.

A county levying a tax for emergency purposes as provided in section 57-15-28 may levy a tax not exceeding two mills in a county with a population of thirty thousand or more, four mills in a county with a population under thirty thousand but more than five thousand, or six mills in a county with a population of five thousand or fewer.

A county levying a tax for county emergency medical service according to section 57-15-50 may levy a tax not exceeding fifteen mills.

A county levying a tax for weed control as provided in section 4.1-47-14 may levy a tax not exceeding four mills.

A county levying a tax for programs and activities for senior citizens according to section 57-15-56 may levy a tax not exceeding two mills.

Tax levies made for paying the principal and interest on any obligations of the county evidenced by the issuance of bonds.

A county levying a tax for a job development authority as provided in section 11-11.1-04 may levy a tax not exceeding four mills on the taxable valuation of property within the county. However, if any city within the county is levying a tax for support of a job development authority and the total of the county and city levies exceeds four mills, the county tax levy within the city levying under subsection 12 of section 57-15-10 must be reduced so the total levy in the city does not exceed four mills.

A levy for an extraordinary expenditure under section 11-11-24 approved by the electors of the county before January 1, 2015, may continue to be levied and collected under provisions of law in effect when the levy was approved and for the term it was approved by the electors. When the levy authority for an extraordinary expenditure ends under this subsection, the fund must be closed out and any unobligated balance in the fund must be transferred to the county general fund.

Levies dedicated under section 57-15-59 before January 1, 2015, for lease payments may be continued to be levied and collected for the duration of the lease. When the levy authority for lease payments ends under this subsection, the fund must be closed out and any unobligated balance in the fund must be transferred to the county general fund. A lease for county facilities effective after December 31, 2014, is subject to the capital projects levy limitations of section 57-15-06.6.

Tax levy or mill levy limitations do not apply to any statute which expressly provides that taxes authorized to be levied therein are not subject to mill levy limitations provided by law.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 606, § 55; 1983, ch. 89, § 5; 1983, ch. 610, § 2; 1985, ch. 82, § 137; 1985, ch. 161, § 7; 1985, ch. 614, § 2; 1987, ch. 149, § 3; 1987, ch. 675, § 1; 1987, ch. 676, § 7; 1987, ch. 677, § 5; 1989, ch. 145, § 8; 1989, ch. 579, § 2; 1991, ch. 108, § 6; 1991, ch. 504, § 11; 1995, ch. 61, §§ 12, 14; 1995, ch. 553, § 2; 1997, ch. 58, § 16; 1999, ch. 154, § 2; 1999, ch. 499, § 1; 1999, ch. 501, § 3; 2001, ch. 246, § 15; 2001, ch. 458, § 2; 2001, ch. 511, § 1; 2003, ch. 92, § 3; 2003, ch. 95, § 2; 2003, ch. 96, § 16; 2003, ch. 138, § 98; 2005, ch. 550, § 2; 2005, ch. 551, § 1; 2011, ch. 452, § 1; 2015, ch. 329, § 10; 2015, ch. 439, § 71; 2017, ch. 61, § 11, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016; 2017, ch. 341, § 11, eff for the first two taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016; 2019, ch. 391, § 133, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018; 2019, ch. 213, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 57-15-06.7 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 133 of Chapter 391, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2124; and Section 3 of Chapter 213, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1268.

Section 57-15-06.7 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 11 of Chapter 329, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2206; and Section 11 of Chapter 61, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2026.

57-15-06.8.
County tax levies and limitations not in addition to the general fund levy. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 606, § 67; 1985, ch. 82, § 138; 1985, ch. 89, § 3; 1985, ch. 614, § 3; 1985, ch. 615, § 1; 1987, ch. 676, § 8; 1995, ch. 61, § 13; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-06.9.
Tax levy for county parks and recreational facilities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 145, § 9; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-06.10.
Optional consolidation of county mill levies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 516, § 1; 2009, ch. 86, § 34; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-07.
City tax levies.

The governing body, in levying city taxes, is limited by the amount necessary to meet the appropriations included in the city budget for the ensuing fiscal year and to provide a reserve fund as limited in this chapter, together with a tax sufficient in amount to pay the interest on the bonded debt of the municipality, and to provide a sinking fund to pay the principal at maturity.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 73, § 7, art. 9; 1893, ch. 33, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 2190; R.C. 1899, § 2190; S.L. 1905, ch. 62, § 123; R.C. 1905, § 2756; C.L. 1913, § 3680; S.L. 1927, ch. 188, § 3; 1929, ch. 235, § 5; 1931, ch. 297, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-1507; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 243; 1985, ch. 613, § 2.

57-15-08.
General fund levy limitations in cities.

The aggregate amount levied for city general fund purposes may not exceed an amount produced by a levy of one hundred five mills on the taxable valuation of property in the city. A city, when authorized by a majority vote of the electors of the city voting on the question at a regularly scheduled or special election called for such purpose pursuant to a resolution approved by the governing body of the city, may increase the maximum mill levy for general city purposes by not more than ten mills.

A city that levied more than one hundred five mills for taxable year 2015 in the combined number of mills levied for general fund purposes plus the number of mills levied for other purposes which were combined into the general fund for taxable years after 2014 may levy for general fund purposes for taxable year 2016 the same number of mills that was levied for those purposes for taxable year 2015. A city may levy for general fund purposes for taxable year 2017 one hundred five mills plus seventy-five percent of the combined number of mills exceeding one hundred five that was levied for those purposes for taxable year 2015. A city may levy for general fund purposes for taxable year 2018 one hundred five mills plus fifty percent of the combined number of mills exceeding one hundred five that was levied for those purposes for taxable year 2015. A city may levy for general fund purposes for taxable year 2019 one hundred five mills plus twenty-five percent of the combined number of mills exceeding one hundred five that was levied for those purposes for taxable year 2015.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 5, subs. b; 1931, ch. 297, § 1, subs. b; 1935, ch. 208, § 1; 1937, ch. 175, § 1; 1941, ch. 210, § 1; 1943, ch. 252; R.C. 1943, § 57-1508; S.L. 1947, ch. 355, § 1; 1953, ch. 314, § 1; 1957, ch. 352, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 57-1508; S.L. 1965, ch. 352, § 9; 1967, ch. 428, § 1; 1981, ch. 572, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 47; 1997, ch. 108, § 34; 1999, ch. 50, § 72; 2015, ch. 439, § 72, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014; 2017, ch. 57, § 15, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Debt void if entailing tax beyond legal rate, see N.D.C.C. § 57-45-07.

Municipal memorial hall levy outside levy limitations, see N.D.C.C. ch. 40-59.

57-15-09.
Tax levy limitations in villages. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 285.

57-15-10.
Exceptions to tax levy limitations in cities.

The tax levy limitations specified in section 57-15-08 do not apply to the following tax levies:

Taxes levied pursuant to law for a proportion of the cost of a special improvement project by general taxation.

Taxes levied pursuant to law for the purpose of paying a deficiency in connection with a special improvement project.

Taxes levied to pay interest on a bonded debt, or the principal of such debt, at maturity.

Taxes, not exceeding four mills, levied for the purpose of establishing and maintaining a library fund for public library services in accordance with section 40-38-02.

Taxes levied on property of an agricultural fair association, a nonprofit club or like organization, or an organization of college students located within a municipality and otherwise exempt under subsection 10 or 11 of section 57-02-08, to pay such property’s proportionate share of the cost of fire protection services maintained by the municipal corporation.

Taxes, not exceeding five mills, levied for the purpose of establishing and maintaining a municipal arts council in accordance with section 40-38.1-02.

Taxes levied for airport purposes in accordance with section 2-06-15 may be levied in an amount not exceeding four mills.

Taxes levied for a capital improvements fund approved by a majority of the electors of the city in accordance with section 57-15-38 for specified purposes may be levied in a specified amount not exceeding ten mills. Taxes levied for a capital improvements fund approved by sixty percent or more of the electors of the city in accordance with section 57-15-38 for general purposes may be levied in an amount not exceeding ten mills. Taxes levied for a capital improvements fund approved by sixty percent or more of the electors of the city in accordance with section 57-15-38 for specified purposes may be levied in a specified amount not exceeding an additional ten mills.

Taxes levied for emergency purposes pursuant to section 57-15-48 may be levied in an amount not exceeding two and one-half mills.

Taxes levied for public transportation in accordance with section 57-15-55 may be levied in an amount not exceeding five mills.

Taxes levied for programs and activities for senior citizens in accordance with section 57-15-56 may be levied in an amount not exceeding two mills.

Taxes levied for a city job development authority or industrial development organization as provided in section 40-57.4-04 may be levied in an amount not exceeding four mills.

Taxes levied for a city public recreation system approved by electors as provided in section 40-55-09 may be levied in the amount approved by the electors, not exceeding six mills.

Taxes levied for maintenance and improvement of cemeteries owned by the city under section 57-15-27.1 may be levied in an amount not exceeding two mills.

Taxes levied for retirement of bonds issued before January 1, 2015, under section 40-57-19 or 40-57-19.1 may be levied in the amount required for annual payments until the bonds are retired.

Levies dedicated under section 57-15-59 before January 1, 2015, for lease payments may be continued to be levied and collected for the duration of the lease. When the levy authority for lease payments ends under this subsection, the fund must be closed out and any unobligated balance in the fund must be transferred to the city general fund.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 5; 1931, ch. 297, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-1510; S.L. 1957, ch. 352, § 4; 1957 Supp., § 57-1510; S.L. 1963, ch. 383, § 1; 1967, ch. 323, § 244; 1981, ch. 419, § 10; 1983, ch. 593, § 48; 1983, ch. 606, § 73; 1983, ch. 611, § 2; 1985, ch. 82, §§ 139, 162; 1985, ch. 604, § 22; 1985, ch. 616, § 1; 1987, ch. 149, § 4; 1987, ch. 677, § 6; 1989, ch. 697, § 1; 1999, ch. 50, § 73; 1999, ch. 211, § 18; 1999, ch. 499, § 2; 2003, ch. 95, § 3; 2003, ch. 96, § 17; 2003, ch. 138, § 99; 2015, ch. 439, § 73, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014; 2017, ch. 410, § 2, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016.

Cross-References.

Exemption of levies to pay bonds issued for purchase of special assessment warrants, see N.D.C.C. § 40-27-05.

Payment and compromise of judgments against cities, see N.D.C.C. ch. 40-43.

57-15-10.1.
Counties and cities may levy for certain advertising purposes.

The board of county commissioners of any county or the governing body of any city may provide funding for the purpose of advertising the resources and opportunities in the county or city and promoting industrial development from revenues derived from the county or city general fund levy authority.

When any county or city makes the levy provided for by this section, the expenditure of the fund must be under the direction of the governing board of the county or city.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 294, § 1; 1955, ch. 318, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-15101; S.L. 1963, ch. 384, § 1; 1967, ch. 323, § 245; 1981, ch. 573, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 49; 1983, ch. 606, § 74; 2015, ch. 439, § 74, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-10.2.
Tax levy for port purposes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 57, § 20, effective August 1, 2017.

57-15-11.
Park district tax levies.

The board of park commissioners, in levying park district taxes, is limited by the amount necessary to meet the appropriations included in the park district budget for the ensuing fiscal year, and to provide a reserve fund as limited in this chapter, together with a tax sufficient in amount to pay the interest on the bonded debt of the municipality and to provide a sinking fund to pay the principal at maturity.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 6; 1939, ch. 176, § 1; 1941, ch. 206, § 1; 1943, ch. 186, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-1511; S.L. 1985, ch. 613, § 3.

57-15-12.
General fund levy limitations in park districts.

A park district may levy for general fund purposes up to thirty-eight mills on the taxable valuation of property in the district, subject to the higher of the number of mills determined under the following limitations:

The general fund mill levy determined based upon the highest amount in dollars the park district levied for general fund purposes for the three taxable years immediately preceding the current year, plus twelve percent; or

The general fund mill levy determined by combining the highest number of mills the park district levied for general fund purposes plus the number of mills levied for employee pension contributions under section 40-49-22, old-age and survivors’ insurance under section 52-09-08, an employee retirement program established by the governing body, and for forestry purposes for any one of the three taxable years immediately preceding the current year.

Notwithstanding the limitation in subsection 1, if a city public recreation system established under chapter 40-55 is merged with a park district, the park district may levy up to thirty-eight mills on the taxable valuation of property in the district for general fund purposes for the first taxable year in which mills are levied for the merged district.

A park district may increase its general fund levy under this section to any number of mills approved by a majority of the electors of the park district voting on the question at a regular or special park district election, up to a maximum levy under this section of thirty-eight mills on the dollar of the taxable valuation of the district for the current year. After January 1, 2015, approval or reauthorization by electors of voter-approved levy authority under this section may not be effective for more than ten taxable years.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 6; 1939, ch. 176, § 1; 1941, ch. 206, § 1; 1943, ch. 186, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-1512; S.L. 1945, ch. 301, §§ 1, 2; 1947, ch. 357, § 1; 1957, ch. 353, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 57-1512; S.L. 1971, ch. 541, § 1; 1981, ch. 425, § 2; 1983, ch. 593, § 50; 1985, ch. 235, § 97; 1997, ch. 108, § 35; 2001, ch. 510, § 6; 2015, ch. 439, § 75, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014; 2019, ch. 480, § 2, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018.

Cross-References.

Tax levy for park district’s employees’ pension fund, see N.D.C.C. § 40-49-22.